Hawaii statutes.
DELINQUENT
TAXES

§231-13 Director; examination,
investigation, and collection. [Repeal and reenactment on June 30,
2017. L 2013, c 93, §4.] (a) The director of taxation shall be
responsible for the collection and general administration of all taxes,
including delinquent taxes. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
director, by contract, may select and retain bonded collection agencies,
licensed attorneys, accountants, and auditors or other persons for the purpose
of assessment, enforcement, or collection of taxes from persons subject to the
provisions of title 14 administered by the department.

(b) At the option of the director, any
contract entered into under this section may provide for compensation on:

(1) A fixed price basis;

(2) An hourly rate basis with or without a fixed cap;
or

(3) A contingent fee arrangement to be specified in
the contract; provided that this paragraph shall not apply to auditors and
accountants.

All compensation shall be payable out of the
taxes recovered for the State or from the taxpayer in accordance with the terms
of, and up to the amount authorized by the contract, unless otherwise
determined by the director. [L 1933, c 135, §2; RL 1935, §1966; am L 1937, c
241, §1; RL 1945, §5118; RL 1955, §115-18; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16; HRS
§231-13; am L 1982, c 88, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 34, §3; am L 1997, c
253, §1; am L 1999, c 68, §1; am L 2013, c 93, §1]

Note

Reports to legislature on contracts for the assessment,
enforcement, or collection of taxes up through June 30, 2017; annual report of
all contracts to 2014-2017 legislature. L 2013, c 93, §2.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next